New York, session 2025-2026, A5955.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The department of corrections and community supervision 2 shall undertake a study of the treatment, conditions and prevalence of 3 aging prison populations and what plans, if any, such department has to 4 provide for this increasing segment of incarcerated individuals. The 5 study shall include but not be limited to the following: 6 (a) a profile of the current elderly incarcerated individual popu- 7 lation and statistics relating to its demographics including length and 8 type of sentence, age at parole eligibility, race, gender, region of 9 commitment, commitment crime and any other data that may describe such 10 population; 11 (b) projected populations for elderly incarcerated individuals for the 12 next five, ten and twenty years; 13 (c) factors contributing to the growth in the number and proportion of 14 elderly incarcerated individuals; 15 (d) whether, and to what extent, older prison populations are being 16 provided with adequate or specialized housing, medical care, and 17 specialized programs that respond to their unique needs and vulnerabili- 18 ties, such as the need for wheelchair accessibility or accommodations 19 relating to diminished mental or physical capacity, including a profile 20 of such housing, medical care and programs currently provided to elderly 21 incarcerated individuals and a projection of such provisions that will 22 be needed five, ten and twenty years hence; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10074-01-5 A. 5955 2 1 (e) provision of specialized training for corrections officers working 2 with older incarcerated individuals including what training is currently 3 provided; and 4 (f) a profile of classification and facilities assigned to such incar- 5 cerated individuals including what institutional oversight, if any, 6 exists to ensure the welfare of older incarcerated individuals within 7 each correctional facility. 8 § 2. The department of corrections and community supervision shall 9 make a report to the governor and the legislature of the information 10 required under section one of this act, its findings and conclusions, 11 and any legislative recommendations it deems necessary no later than one 12 year after the effective date of this act. 13 § 3. To the maximum extent feasible, the department of corrections and 14 community supervision shall be entitled to request and receive and shall 15 utilize and be provided with such facilities, resources and data of any 16 court, department, division, board, bureau, commission or agency of the 17 state or any political subdivision thereof as it may reasonably request 18 to carry out properly its responsibilities pursuant to this act. 19 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.